Utah statutes.
38-10-101.   Definitions.
As used in this chapter:
(1)  "Contractor" means any person who, under contract with the owner or an
operator designated by an owner, performs work upon or furnishes materials or
equipment for any production unit.
(2)  "Lien claimant" means contractors and subcontractors who claim a lien
under this chapter.
(3)  "Mine" means a mining claim, mineral deposit, ore deposit, quarry, or
mining lease and any related shaft, tunnel, incline, drift, or excavation.
(4)  "Owner" means a person holding any operating right, working interest, or
interest in the legal or equitable title, to any real property, mine, oil
lease, gas lease, well, or any combination of these, unless otherwise provided
in this chapter.
(5)  "Production unit" means:
(a)  the drilling unit for a well established by lawful order or rule of the
Board of Oil, Gas, and Mining in which the well is located; or if not
applicable, 40 acres comprising the quarter-quarter section, or equivalent
legal subdivision, in which the well is located; or
(b)  a mine, and if work is performed upon or materials or equipment furnished
to any part of the mine from which two or more mines are worked, the
production unit shall extend to the owner's interest in the mines so worked.
(6)  "Subcontractor" means any person, other than the contractor, who, under
contract with a contractor or another subcontractor, performs work upon or
furnishes materials or equipment for any production unit.
